Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 10, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024, as amended by Section 4, Chapter 187, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 20J), is amended to read as follows:
Section 20J. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or
after January 1, 2026, Class B5 shall include the following criminal
offenses:

1. Second or subsequent conviction for assault and battery
against a current or former intimate partner or a family or
household member, as provided for in subsection C of Section 644 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
2. Second or subsequent conviction for domestic abuse committed
in the presence of a child, as provided for in subsection G of
Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
3. Assault and battery by strangulation or attempted
strangulation against an intimate partner or a family or household
member, as provided for in subsection J of Section 644 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
4. Aggravated assault and battery, as provided for in Section
646 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
5. Battery or assault and battery upon a police officer,
sheriff, deputy sheriff, highway patrolman, corrections personnel,
or other state peace officer, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 649 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
6. Striking or mistreating a police dog or police horse during
the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 649.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
7. Disfiguring, disabling, or killing a police dog or police
horse during the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 649.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
8. Battery or assault and battery resulting in bodily injury to
any employee or contracted employee of the Office of Juvenile
Affairs or, residential facility, or county detention center as
provided for in subsection E of Section 650.2 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
9. Assault with intent to kill, as provided for in Section 653
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 2011 Page 2

10. Assault with intent to commit any felony, as provided for
in Section 681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
11. Manslaughter in the second degree, as provided for in
Section 716 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
12. Owning a mischievous animal that kills a human being, as
provided for in Section 717 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
13. Causing, aiding, abetting, or encouraging a minor to commit
or participate in committing a felony offense, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 856 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
14. Causing, aiding, abetting, encouraging, soliciting, or
recruiting a minor to participate, join, or associate with any
criminal street gang, as provided for in subsection D of Section 856
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
15. Committing a gang-related offense as a condition of
membership in a criminal street gang, as provided for in Section
856.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
16. Stalking, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1173
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
17. Second or subsequent conviction of stalking or committing
the act of stalking within ten (10) years of the completion of
sentence for a prior conviction of stalking, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1173 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
18. Intentionally or recklessly spreading an infectious
disease, as provided for in Section 1192.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
19. Entering the premises of another while masked or disguised
with the intent to inflict bodily injury or injury to property, as
provided for in Section 1302 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 2011 Page 3

20. Assault with a dangerous weapon while masked or in
disguise, as provided for in Section 1303 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
21. Unlawful assembly for the purpose of engaging in a riot, as
provided for in Section 1320.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
22. Acts of cruelty to animals, as provided for in Section 1685
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
23. Instigating or encouraging any cockfight, as provided for
in Section 1692.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
24. Keeping a pit or other place or knowingly providing
equipment or facilities for cockfighting, as provided for in Section
1692.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
25. Servicing or facilitating a cockfight, as provided for in
Section 1692.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
26. Owning, possessing, keeping, or training any bird for
cockfighting, as provided for in Section 1692.5 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
27. Instigating or encouraging any fight between dogs, as
provided for in Section 1694 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
28. Keeping a house, pit, or other place, or providing any
equipment or facilities to be used for any fight between dogs, as
provided for in Section 1695 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
29. Acting or performing any service in the furtherance of or
facilitating any dogfight, as provided for in Section 1696 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
30. Owning, possessing, keeping, or training any dog with
intent to have such dog fight another dog, as provided for in
Section 1697 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 2011 Page 4

31. Failing to stop for an accident resulting in a nonfatal
injury to another person, as provided for in Section 10-102 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
32. Personal injury accident while driving or operating a motor
vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating
substance while having a previous conviction for driving or
operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or
other intoxicating substance, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 11-904 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. Failure to register as a sex offender, as provided for in
Section 583 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Furnishing false or misleading information in the
registration required by the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as
provided for in Section 586 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. Failure to comply with the Sex Offenders Registration Act,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 587 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
36. Failure to comply with established guidelines of global-
positioning-system Global Positioning System (GPS) monitoring
pursuant to the provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 587 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
37. Temporarily or permanently residing within a two-thousand-
foot radius of a public or private school site or other listed
places by a person required to register pursuant to the Sex
Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
38. Residing with a minor child after being convicted of an
offense that involved a minor child by a person required to register
pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
39. Two or more sex offenders residing together in a dwelling
during the term of registration as a sex offender, as provided for
ENR. S. B. NO. 2011 Page 5

in subsection A of Section 590.1 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
40. Establishing, leasing, operating, or owning any structure
where persons required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders
Registration Act are allowed to reside, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 590.1 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class B5 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 11, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20K), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20K. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or
after January 1, 2026, Class B6 shall include the following criminal
offenses:
1. Striking, tormenting, mistreating, or administering a
nonpoisonous desensitizing substance to a police dog or police
horse, as provided for in subsection A of Section 649.1 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
2. Interfering with the lawful performance of a police dog or
police horse, as provided for in subsection B of Section 649.1 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
3. Harming, torturing, injuring, disabling, or otherwise
mistreating or killing a service animal during the commission of a
misdemeanor or felony offense, as provided for in subsection D of
Section 649.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
4. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon a Department
of Corrections employee by a person in the custody of the Department
of Corrections, as provided for in subsection A of Section 650.2 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
5. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an employee of
a private prison contractor by a person incarcerated in an
institution operated by a private prison contractor, as provided for
ENR. S. B. NO. 2011 Page 6

in subsection B of Section 650.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
6. Aggravated assault and battery upon a Department of Human
Services employee or contractor, as provided for in subsection C of
Section 650.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
7. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an employee of
the Office of Juvenile Affairs or contracted employee of a county
detention facility pursuant to a contract with the Office of
Juvenile Affairs by a person in the custody of the Office of
Juvenile Affairs, as provided for in subsection D of Section 650.2
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
8. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon a medical care
provider, as provided for in Section 650.4 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
9. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an officer of
the court, witness, or juror, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 650.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
10. Aggravated assault and battery upon a school employee, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 650.7 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
11. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an employee
of a facility maintained by the Office of Juvenile Affairs, a
facility maintained by a private contractor, juvenile detention
center, or juvenile bureau, as provided for in Section 650.8 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
12. Throwing, transferring, or placing any feces, urine, semen,
saliva, or blood upon an employee of the state, a county, or a city,
as provided for in Section 650.9 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
13. Medical battery, as provided for in Section 650.11 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title; and
14. Child endangerment, as provided for in Section 852.1 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2011 Page 7

B. Any person convicted of a Class B6 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 650.2, as
amended by Section 153, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 650.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 650.2. A. Every person in the custody of the Oklahoma
Department of Corrections who, without justifiable or excusable
cause, knowingly commits any assault, battery, or assault and
battery upon the person of a Department of Corrections employee
while said the employee is in the performance of his or her duties
shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a Class B6 felony
offense.
B. Every person incarcerated in an institution operated by a
private prison contractor, pursuant to Section 561, 563.1, or 563.2
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes, who, without justifiable or
excusable cause, knowingly commits any assault, battery, or assault
and battery upon the person of an employee of the contractor while
said the employee is in the performance of his or her duties shall,
upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a Class B6 felony offense.
C. Every person in the custody of the Department of Human
Services who, without justifiable or excusable cause, knowingly
commits any aggravated assault and battery upon the person of a
Department of Human Services employee, or a person contracting with
the Department to provide services, while the employee or contractor
is in the performance of his or her duties shall, upon conviction
thereof, be guilty of a Class B6 felony offense.
D. Every person in the custody of the Office of Juvenile
Affairs who, without justifiable or excusable cause, knowingly
commits any assault, battery, or assault and battery upon the person
of an employee of the Office of Juvenile Affairs or a contracted
employee of a county detention facility pursuant to a contract with
the Office of Juvenile Affairs while said the employee or contracted
employee is in the performance of his or her duties shall, upon
conviction thereof, be guilty of a Class B6 felony offense.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2011 Page 8

E. Every person in the custody of the Office of Juvenile
Affairs who, without justifiable or excusable cause, knowingly
commits any battery or assault and battery resulting in bodily
injury to any employee of the Office of Juvenile Affairs or,
employee of any residential facility, or contracted employee of a
county detention center pursuant to a contract with the Office of
Juvenile Affairs while said the employee or contracted employee is
in the performance of his or her duties of employment shall, upon
conviction thereof, be guilty of a Class B5 felony offense. The
fine for a violation of this subsection shall not be less than Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00), which may be imposed whether or not a period of
incarceration is imposed.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2011 Page 9

Passed the Senate the 24th day of February, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 2011 Page 10